Washington statutes.
RCW 19.230.233

Informal settlement of complaints or enforcement actions.

Except to the extent prohibited by another statute, the director may engage in informal settlement of complaints or enforcement actions including, but not limited to, payment to the department for purposes of financial literacy and education programs authorized under RCW 43.320.150.

[ 2012 c 17 s 16.]